Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 2. Management.

Sec. 42.40.100.
Management by the board.

The board is responsible for the management of the corporation but shall delegate certain powers and duties to the chief executive officer in accordance with AS

42.40.120

. In managing the corporation, the board shall

be responsible for the management of the financial and legal obligations of the Alaska Railroad;

operate the Alaska Railroad as a common carrier subject to the jurisdiction of the United States Surface Transportation Board consistent with 45 U.S.C. 1207;

generally manage the corporation on a self-sustaining basis;

apply to the legislature for an appropriation with the concurrence of the governor to be used to provide a particular service that is not otherwise self-sustaining if a subsidy is required to maintain that service;

provide for safe, efficient, and economical transportation to meet the overall needs of the state;

raise needed capital by issuing bonds of the corporation upon approval by the legislature while ensuring that borrowing by the corporation does not directly or indirectly endanger the state’s own borrowing capacity;

review all state and other land disposal proposals to aid in planning for future development or expansion of transportation services;

ensure that the procurement procedures of the corporation meet accepted railroad industry standards;

ensure that the accounting procedures of the corporation meet generally accepted accounting principles consistent with industry standards for comparable railroads.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 40 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Sec. 42.40.110.
Executive officers.

The board shall appoint the chief executive officer of the corporation who serves at the pleasure of the board. The board shall fix compensation for the chief executive officer.

The chief executive officer of the corporation shall appoint and fix the compensation for other executive officers. The compensation for an executive officer appointed under this subsection is subject to board approval.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.120.
Delegation.

The board shall by rule delegate to the chief executive officer powers and duties necessary or appropriate for the management of the daily affairs and operations of the corporation. The board may by rule require the exercise of a delegated power or duty to be subject to board approval.

Within 60 days after its first meeting, the board shall delegate the following activities of the corporation to the chief executive officer or other executive officers designated by the board:

leasing subject to AS

42.40.285

and

42.40.350(b)

and (d), granting easements in, issuing permits for the use of, or conveying other interests in property that do not constitute a transfer of the corporation’s entire interest in land;

establishing specific rates, tariffs, divisions, and contract rate agreements;

making routine changes in service levels;

establishing procurement and accounting procedures for the corporation; and

performing procurement activities.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, specific board approval is required for the following:

issuing bonds upon approval by the legislature;

mortgaging or pledging corporation assets;

donating property or other assets belonging to the corporation;

acting as a surety or guarantor;

adopting a long-range capital improvement and program plan;

adopting annual reports;

effecting general, comprehensive increases and decreases in rates;

expanding or reducing services in a major way;

expanding the main or branch rail lines including spur, industrial, team, switching, or side tracks, other than performing routine track alignment as necessary to maintain existing service levels;

selecting independent auditors and accountants;

entering into collective bargaining agreements;

adopting annual budgets;

beginning a capital project with an estimated completion cost of more than $500,000 or an estimated completion time of more than one year;

exchanging, donating, selling, or otherwise conveying its entire interest in land subject to approval by the legislature;

exercising the power of eminent domain.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)